Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 4. Vaults, Crypts and Mausoleums

§ 35-8-401.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Columbarium” means any building, structure or any part of a building or structure which is used for the interment of cremated human remains;

“Community vault, crypt, columbarium, mausoleum or structure” means one constructed for the purpose of containing the bodies or remains of more than six (6) dead human beings;

“State department of health” means the state department of health created by W.S.

9-2-101

;

“State insurance commissioner” means the insurance commissioner of Wyoming appointed under W.S.

26-2-102

;

“This act” means W.S.

35-8-401

through

35-8-407

.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 224, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-412; Laws 1989, ch. 203, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 35-8-402.
Regulations and specifications generally; application to certain columbariums.

No person, firm, partnership, association, company or corporation shall construct any community vault, crypt, columbarium or mausoleum, wholly or partially above the surface of the ground, to be used to contain the body or remains of any dead human being unless the same shall be located within the confines of an established cemetery containing not less than five (5) acres, which cemetery shall have been in existence and operation for a period of at least five (5) years immediately preceding the time of the erection thereof, nor until plans and specifications therefor shall be approved by the state board of health [department of health]. Such plans and specifications shall set forth the sections, halls, rooms, corridors, elevators or other subdivisions thereof, with their descriptive names and numbers, and shall provide:

That such structure be so arranged that any vault, cell, niche or crypt may be readily examined at any time by any person authorized by law to do so;

That suitable provision be made for permanently sealing each crypt or cell after the placing of any body therein, and in such manner that no fluid may escape therefrom;

That the foundation shall extend below the frost line and shall be of reinforced construction;

That the exterior walls and roof shall be constructed of granite or marble and shall not be less than six (6) inches in thickness;

That exterior doors shall be constructed of bronze or aluminum alloys or any other material or alloy of similar properties;

That interiors shall be constructed of granite, marble, slate, sandstone or limestone;

That the structure shall contain adequate provision for drainage and ventilation;

That the structure shall be so constructed as to insure its beauty, durability and permanence, as well as the safety, convenience, comfort and health of the community in which it is located, as dictated and determined at the time by modern mausoleum construction and engineering science.

The person making application shall file a certificate of such approval, signed by the state health officer, with a copy of such plans and specifications, in the office of the county clerk of the county wherein such structure is to be erected, and such clerk shall retain the same on file. No crypt, room or niche in any community mausoleum, columbarium or structure shall be sold or offered for sale until such structure shall be entirely completed.

This act shall not apply to any columbarium owned by or for a church if it is less than one-half (1/2) acre in size and is located immediately contiguous to or is part of the church facility and is perpetually cared for. If the church relocates, it shall relocate all urns and remains placed within the columbarium. Any violation of this subsection is subject to the penalty imposed under W.S.

35-8-407

.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 224, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 35-413; Laws 1989, ch. 203, § 1; 2011, ch. 151, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

in (c), deleted “and the maintenance of the columbarium is insured by a trust fund meeting the requirements of W.S.

35-8-404

” after “cared for,” and made related changes.

Laws 2011, ch. 151, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2011.

Board of health. —

The powers, duties and authority of the board of health have been transferred to the department of health. See §

9-2-101

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “[t]his act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-8-401(a)(v).

§ 35-8-403.
Supervision of inspector required in erecting structure; compliance with requirements for perpetual care and maintenance.

Such structure shall be erected under the supervision of an inspector to be appointed by the state department of health, which shall determine the amount of his compensation, and the compensation shall be paid by the person, partnership, firm, association, company or corporation erecting the same. No community vault, crypt, niche, mausoleum, columbarium or structure, and no addition or alteration thereof, shall be used for the purpose of interring therein a body or the remains of a deceased human being until the person, partnership, association, company, firm or corporation operating such structure shall have obtained from the department of health a certificate, signed by the state health officer, certifying that the plans and specifications filed pursuant to the provisions of W.S.

35-8-401

and

35-8-402

have been complied with, and from the state insurance commissioner a certificate certifying that the requirements for a perpetual care and maintenance fund set forth in W.S.

35-8-404

have been complied with, which certificates shall be filed in the office of the county clerk of the county wherein the community vault, crypt, niche, mausoleum, columbarium or structure is located.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 224, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 35-414; Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

§ 35-8-404.
Perpetual care and maintenance trust fund.

Before any cell, vault, crypt, room or niche in any community mausoleum or columbarium shall be sold, the person, firm, partnership, association, company or corporation operating the same shall first deposit the sum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) in an institution acceptable to the insurance commissioner, which sum shall be designated as a perpetual care and maintenance trust fund and the income therefrom shall be used for the preservation and upkeep of the mausoleum or columbarium. The insurance commissioner shall regularly audit the fund and shall be empowered to formulate and establish regulations governing the fund and its trustee, which regulations shall be designed to insure the permanence and security of the fund. In the event that sales of cells, vaults, crypts, rooms or niches exceed the sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00) the person, firm, partnership, association, company or corporation operating the mausoleum or columbarium shall deposit the following percentages of all sales exceeding that amount in the perpetual care trust fund, which additional sums shall be subject to the same regulations as the original deposit:

Twenty percent (20%) of the proceeds received from the sale of each cell, vault, crypt, room or niche; provided, however, that the deposit from the sale of a crypt shall not be less than the sum of one hundred dollars ($100.00) regardless of the sale price thereof;

Twenty percent (20%) of each payment or installment received from the sale of every cell, vault, crypt, room or niche in the event that a sale is made on a payment or installment plan; provided, however, that the total amount deposited from the sale of any crypt on the payment or installment plan shall not be less than the sum of one hundred dollars ($100.00) regardless of the sale price or the amount of the payment or installment.

In the event that any person, firm, partnership, association, company or corporation operating a community mausoleum, columbarium or structure shall fail to continue the active management thereof, the trustee of the perpetual care and maintenance fund established therefor shall continue to administer the fund subject to audit and regulation by the insurance commissioner and disburse the income for the care and maintenance of the mausoleum or columbarium; provided, however, that the district judge may, upon application made by the county attorney of the county in which the mausoleum or columbarium is located, and good cause shown, order the appointment of a successor trustee and/or disbursement of the principal or interest of the fund.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 224, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 35-415.

Cross references. —

As to perpetual care fund, see §

35-8-103

.

§ 35-8-405.
Removal of body from vault constituting menace to public health; reinterment; cost; construction contrary to W.S. 35-8-401 through 35-8-407 deemed nuisance; enjoining.

When any mausoleum, vault, crypt or structure containing one (1) or more deceased human bodies, shall, in the opinion of the state department of health, become a menace to public health, and the owner or owners shall fail to remedy or remove the same to the satisfaction of the department, the judge of any district court of the state of Wyoming may, upon application by the county attorney of the county in which it is located, order the person, firm, partnership, association, company or corporation owning the structure to remove the deceased body or bodies for interment in some suitable cemetery at the expense of the person, firm, partnership, association, company or corporation owning the mausoleum, vault or crypt. If no person, firm, partnership, association, company or corporation can be found in the county where the mausoleum, vault or crypt is located, the removal and interment shall be at the expense of the cemetery, city, town or county within which the mausoleum, vault or crypt is located, or of the cemetery association in charge of any such cemetery, provided, however, that if there is a perpetual care and maintenance fund in existence for the care of the mausoleum, vault, crypt or structure, the expense incident thereto may be defrayed from the principal of the fund by order of the district judge. Any columbarium or mausoleum maintained or constructed contrary to the provisions of this act shall be deemed a public nuisance, and may be enjoined in an action brought by any taxpayer of this state in the district court.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 224, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 35-416; Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to nuisances generally, see §§

6-6-201

to

6-6-209

.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “department of health” for “board of health,” “the department” for “said board,” and made stylistic changes throughout.

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-8-401(a)(v).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 35-8-406.
Rules and regulations.

The state department of health and the insurance commissioner are hereby empowered and directed to make such rules and regulations as shall in their judgment be necessary for the carrying out of the provisions of this act, which regulations shall have the force and effect of law.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 224, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 35-417; Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-8-401(a)(v).

§ 35-8-407.
Penalty.

Any person, officer, manager or agent of any firm, partnership, association, company or corporation who violates any provisions of this act shall be fined not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), imprisoned not more than six (6) months, or both.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 224, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 35-418; Laws 1989, ch. 203, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-8-401(a)(v).

Severability. —

Section 8, ch. 224, Laws 1957, reads: “It is hereby declared to be legislative intention that if any portion, clause, phase [phrase], section or sections of this act shall be judicially determined to be unconstitutional or invalid, the remainder of the act shall continue in full force and effect.”